Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-502
Department of Administrative Services;
state's health care insurance programs and health care trust fund; plan presented
to Appropriations Committee.

The Department of Administrative Services shall, on or before
December 1 of each year, present its plan regarding the management of the
state's health care insurance programs and the health care trust fund to the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature. This presentation shall include,
but is not limited to, the amount of reserves in the trust fund.

Laws 2013, LB620, § 1.